Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Retirement of Bonds

§ 31-17-21.
State bonds; notice of intention to purchase.

In the event it is determined to purchase outstanding bonds of the state as provided in Section 31-17-3, then sixty (60) days prior to the date fixed for the sale of said bonds, the state bond commission shall advertise its intention to purchase the bonds of the state for at least two (2) consecutive weeks in two (2) newspapers, one (1) of which shall be published in Jackson, Mississippi, and the other a financial journal having general circulation among bond buyers and dealers. Said advertisement shall state the amount of bonds to be purchased, the maximum price to be paid therefor, and the date upon which it will receive sealed proposals for outstanding bonds of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4381; Laws, 1936, ch. 196.

§ 31-17-23.
State bonds; best bid accepted.

The State Bond Commission shall accept the bid or bids determined by it to be most favorable to the state. The interest rate and maturity of the bonds to be purchased shall be taken into consideration in determining the best bid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4382; Laws, 1936, ch. 196.

§ 31-17-25.
State bonds; purchase of bonds sold below par.

Where the bonds of the state were sold for less than par and accrued interest, then the State Bond Commission shall not pay a greater price than the price for which the bonds were sold.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4383; Laws, 1936, ch. 196.

§ 31-17-27.
State bonds; state bond retirement revolving fund.

There is hereby created a fund in the State Treasury only to the extent herein provided, to be known as the “state bond retirement revolving fund,” to be kept separate and distinct from all other funds of the state. Said state bond retirement revolving fund shall consist of such sums as may be appropriated thereto in accordance with law, all sums received from the sale of any bonds as hereinafter provided, all funds received from the payment of either principal or interest on such bonds, and all sums transferred to it or otherwise received and covered into said fund under the provisions of Sections 31-17-27 through 31-17-43. It shall be the duty of the state bond retirement commission, and it is hereby authorized and empowered, to make all needful rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of said sections and which in the discretion of the commission may be necessary or advisable in the administration of the provisions of said sections. The state bond retirement revolving fund hereby created shall be a special trust fund irrevocably pledged to the ultimate retirement of all outstanding full faith and credit bonds of the State of Mississippi as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1944, ch. 140, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 4, 1944).

§ 31-17-29.
State bonds; funds in state bond retirement revolving fund may be invested in federal securities.

Until such funds are needed for the payment of outstanding full faith and credit bonds of the state as herein provided, the state bond retirement commission is hereby authorized to invest any funds held in the state bond retirement revolving fund in bonds, notes, certificates, and other interest bearing obligations which are a direct obligation of the United States of America, hereinafter referred to as federal securities.

Any federal securities so purchased shall be the property of the State of Mississippi, and the principal and any and all interest accruing on such federal securities shall be collected by the commission as an agency of the state and covered into the state bond retirement revolving fund as the same shall mature and accrue. The commission is hereby authorized to sell any federal securities belonging to the state bond retirement revolving fund whenever, in the judgment of the commission, such sale will be to the best interest of the state. Sales shall be made at the best price obtainable, and all funds realized therefrom shall be covered into the state bond retirement revolving fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1944, ch. 140, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 4, 1944).

§ 31-17-31.
State bonds; deposit of federal securities.

All sums paid into the state bond retirement revolving fund shall be kept by the State Treasurer as are other public funds. All federal securities purchased under the provisions of Section 31-17-29 shall be deposited with the State Treasurer and shall be kept by him as are other bonds owned by the state, but he may deposit same under proper trust receipts with one or more state depositories or with any federal reserve bank of the United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1944, ch. 140, § 8; Laws, 1944, ch. 141, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 24, 1944).

§ 31-17-33.
State bonds; method of retirement by state bond retirement commission.

The purpose of Sections 31-17-27 through 31-17-43 is to create a fund for the ultimate retirement of the full faith and credit bonds of the State of Mississippi issued and outstanding as of July 1, 1944, and to set aside, earmark, and irrevocably pledge from the cash now in or to be added to the general fund of the state treasury a sum sufficient to pay all outstanding full faith and credit bonds of the State of Mississippi. To that end, therefore, not less than fifteen (15) days prior to each maturity date of full faith and credit bonds authorized to be retired from funds in the state bond retirement revolving fund under the provisions of said sections, an amount sufficient to pay the principal thereof at such maturity date shall be made available by the state bond retirement commission and shall be withdrawn from the state bond retirement revolving fund upon the order of the commission for the payment thereof, as provided by law. This process shall continue and like withdrawals shall be made at each succeeding maturity date of full faith and credit bonds authorized to be retired from funds in the state bond retirement revolving fund until the said state bond retirement revolving fund shall be exhausted or until all full faith and credit bonds of the state outstanding at July 1, 1944, shall be fully paid and satisfied. When all such bonds are paid, any balance remaining in said state bond retirement revolving fund shall be transferred to the general fund of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1944, ch. 140, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 4, 1944).

§ 31-17-35.
State bonds; maturity dates to be noted.

To effectuate the purpose of Sections 31-17-27 through 31-17-43, the state bond retirement commission is hereby required to take cognizance of the maturity date of the full faith and credit bonds of the state issued and outstanding as of July 1, 1944, and shall invest the funds constituting the state bond retirement revolving fund in United States government securities having maturity dates that bear a reasonable relation to the maturity dates of the full faith and credit bonds of the state to be retired from funds constituting the said state bond retirement revolving fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1944, ch. 140, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 4, 1944).

§ 31-17-37.
State bonds; procedure when funds of state bond retirement revolving fund are inadequate to meet payments.

Should the maturity dates of federal securities held by the state bond retirement commission fail to coincide with the maturity dates of the full faith and credit bonds of the state to the extent that the funds belonging to the state bond retirement revolving fund shall be inadequate to pay the principal of full faith and credit bonds on any maturity date as required by the terms of Sections 31-17-27 through 31-17-43, then in such event the commission is hereby authorized and directed to either sell a sufficient amount of its securities to realize the amount necessary to pay the principal of such maturing bonds or borrow from other sources an amount necessary to provide the funds with which to make such payment, at the lowest and best rate of interest obtainable, after having publicly advertised for bids. The commission shall not pay a higher rate of interest than two percent (2%) for such loans. Such loans shall be evidenced by notes signed in the name of the State of Mississippi by the commission. No such loan shall be made unless there are federal securities held by the commission maturing not later than two (2) years next after the date of the note evidencing the loan, which said federal securities so held, together with the interest thereon, shall be sufficient in amount to retire the said loan and the interest thereon. In no event shall any federal securities held by the commission under the terms of said sections be pledged, hypothecated, or otherwise given as security for any such loan. The chairman of the commission shall accompany each note evidencing funds borrowed with his certificate showing in detail the federal securities held by the commission, the proceeds of which are to be used for the retirement of the said loan. When such certificate shall show that as of the date of any such loan, there was then held by the commission federal securities the par value of which, together with the interest thereon, shall equal or exceed the full amount of the loan covered thereby, such loan shall be in all respects a valid, binding obligation of the State of Mississippi, and shall be promptly paid according to its tenor by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1944, ch. 140, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 4, 1944).

§ 31-17-39.
State bonds; expenditures from and transfer of state bond retirement revolving fund.

All sums paid into and actually in the state bond retirement revolving fund, including the original legislative appropriation, the proceeds from federal securities sold under the provisions of Sections 31-17-27 through 31-17-43, and sums received from the payment of either principal or interest on federal securities purchased hereunder, shall be continuously available to the state bond retirement commission for expenditure or transfer in accordance with the provisions and to carry out the purpose of said sections without the necessity of further appropriation by the Legislature. All such sums shall be considered in the State Treasury only for the purpose and to the extent necessary to make them public funds and subject to the same protection as other public funds. These funds shall be paid out or transferred as provided herein on warrants issued according to law, pursuant to requisitions signed by the chairman and secretary of the commission, on authority of the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1944, ch. 140, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 4, 1944).

§ 31-17-41.
State bonds; records and reports of state bond retirement commission.

The state bond retirement commission shall keep full and accurate minutes of its proceedings. Full and complete records of all transactions made under the authority of Sections 31-17-27 through 31-17-43 and of all sums received into and disbursed from said state bond retirement revolving fund shall be kept by the secretary; and an annual report thereof shall be made by the commission, which shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State and be subject to public inspection. A full report of such transactions and of all such receipts and disbursements shall be made to each regular session of the legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1944, ch. 140, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 4, 1944).

§ 31-17-43.
State bonds; expenses of state bond retirement commission.

The state bond retirement commission shall pay the necessary expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of Sections 31-17-27 through 31-17-43 out of any appropriation made for that purpose by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1944, ch. 140, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 4, 1944).

§ 31-17-45.
Local bonds; repurchase authorized.

The board of supervisors of any county in this state, the mayor and board of aldermen of any municipality in this state, or the governing body of any other taxing district in the state may, in its discretion, purchase outstanding bonds of said county, municipality, or other taxing district and retire such bonds and pay the purchase price thereof out of any surplus remaining in the treasury of such county, municipality, or other taxing district at the end of any fiscal year. The governing body of said taxing districts shall determine the amount of bonds to be purchased, the maximum price to be paid therefor, but in no event to exceed par and accrued interest thereon, and the date upon which it will receive proposals to purchase said bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4371; Laws, 1934, ch. 334.

§ 31-17-47.
Local bonds; notice of intention to purchase.

In the event a surplus is remaining in the treasury of any county, municipality or other taxing district at the end of any fiscal year as provided by Section 31-17-45, then within ten (10) days thereafter the said board of supervisors, mayor and board of aldermen, or the governing body of other taxing districts may advertise its intention to purchase the bonds of such county, municipality, or other taxing district by publishing a notice thereof at least ten (10) days in some newspaper published in said county and one (1) other financial journal having a general circulation among bond buyers and dealers. Said advertisement shall state the amount of bonds to be purchased, the maximum price to be paid therefor, and the date upon which it will receive sealed proposals for outstanding bonds of said taxing district.

Said board of supervisors, mayor and board of aldermen, or the governing body of other taxing districts shall accept the bid or proposal determined and adjudged by it to be most favorable to such taxing district. The interest rate and maturity of the bonds to be purchased shall be taken into consideration in determining the best bid.

However, it shall be optional with the board of supervisors, mayor and board of aldermen, or the governing body of other taxing districts as to whether or not it will advertise its intention to purchase its bonds as provided by this section. In the event the board of supervisors, mayor and board of aldermen, or the governing body of other taxing districts shall determine that it is most advantageous to the county, city, or other taxing district not to so advertise, it may buy and retire its bonds at a private sale without publication of its intention to do so.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 4372, 4373; Laws, 1934, ch. 334.

§ 31-17-49.
Local bonds; purchase of bonds sold below par.

Where the bonds so purchased of said county, municipality, or other taxing districts were sold for less than par and accrued interest, then the said board of supervisors, mayor and board of aldermen, or other governing authority of such taxing district, as the case may be, shall not pay a greater price than the price for which the bonds were sold.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4374; Laws, 1934, ch. 334.

§ 31-17-51.
Local bonds; restrictions on purchases.

Surplus funds shall be expended under the provisions of Sections 31-17-45 through 31-17-51 for the purpose only of retiring the bonds issued in the particular taxing district for which said funds were collected. In no event shall bonds issued for any other taxing district be purchased with funds collected for any district other than those collected from the same identical taxing district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4375; Laws, 1934, ch. 334.

§ 31-17-53.
Local bonds; pledge of securities, properties, and taxes.

The counties, municipalities, and other local authorities possessing power to refund bonds under any statute of Mississippi may, for retiring and paying such refunding bonds and interest, pledge and make applicable to and available therefor any and all securities, properties, and taxes that were pledged, applicable to, or available for the paying of the original issue and interest thereon, so refunded, but only to the same extent, amount, and purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4376; Laws, 1934, ch. 333.

§ 31-17-55.
Local bonds; cancellation.

Whenever the board of supervisors of any county or the board of mayor and aldermen or the proper authorities of any municipalities and/or of any taxing district or other subdivision of any county may have acquired title to any of the bonds of such county, district, or municipality by purchase with, or at the expense of, the sinking funds of the particular sinking fund collected for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest on bonds of the issue so acquired, and sufficient funds shall accumulate in such sinking fund above the amount invested in such bonds, when added to other funds to be paid into said sinking funds within the succeeding twelve (12) months, to provide for and pay the principal of and interest on the bonds of such issue maturing and falling due within the succeeding twelve (12) months, the board of supervisors of such county and of the county embracing such district, and/or board of mayor and aldermen or proper authorities of such municipality or district or subdivision may cancel such bonds so acquired, by order entered upon its minutes and its clerk making entry of cancellation of such bonds upon the proper bond register and stamping or perforating same to show cancellation thereof after cancellation of such bonds, no further taxes shall be levied or collected for the payment of the principal of or interest on the bonds so canceled.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4377; Laws, 1936, ch. 275.

§ 31-17-57.
State and local bonds; paying agent to repay unused funds.

When funds are forwarded to the paying agent of the state, any county or taxing district thereof, or any municipality for the purpose of paying bonds and interest coupons as provided by law, and all bonds and interest coupons to be paid out of such funds are not presented for payment to such paying agent within one (1) year after the due date of such bonds and interest coupons, such bonds and interest coupons shall be payable at the state treasury, the county depository, or the municipal depository, as the case may be.

The paying agent shall submit as of June 30 and December 31 of each year, and within thirty (30) days of that date, a statement of the amount paid on bonds and interest coupons of each bond issue during the previous twelve (12) months and the balance remaining in its hands for such payment at the conclusion of one (1) year on the date submitted, and at least one (1) year from the date the bonds or coupons were due. With the statement submitted, the paying agent shall remit and refund, without demand or request, such balance in its hands. Any money so recovered shall be deposited to the credit of the fund from which it was drawn, and if said fund no longer exists, then said money shall be deposited to the credit of the general fund of the state, county, district or municipality, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4378; Laws, 1938, ch. 134; Laws, 1982, ch. 376, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 31-17-59.
State and local bonds; demand for repayment.

It shall be the duty of the auditor and the state treasurer, within sixty (60) days after the close of each fiscal year, to check the records in their offices and ascertain definitely the amount of bonds and interest coupons which have matured more than twelve (12) months before the close of the last fiscal year and which have not been paid; and if it shall appear that funds for the payment of such bonds and coupons have been forwarded to the paying agent and have not been used for the purpose of paying such bonds and coupons, it shall be the duty of the state treasurer to make demand upon the paying agent for the repayment of said funds into the state treasury within thirty (30) days from the date of such demand.

In like manner, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the board of supervisors of each county and of the municipal clerk of each municipality, within sixty (60) days after the close of each fiscal year, to check the bond register and other records in his office and ascertain definitely the amount of bonds and interest coupons of the county, any taxing district, or of the municipality, as the case may be, which have matured more than twelve (12) months before the close of the last fiscal year and which have not been paid; and if it shall appear that funds for the payment of such bonds and coupons have been forwarded to the paying agent and have not been used for the purpose of paying such bonds and coupons, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the board of supervisors, or the municipal clerk, as the case may be, to make demand upon the paying agent for the repayment of said funds into the county depository or municipal depository, as the case may be, within thirty (30) days from the date of such demand.

In the event such paying agent shall fail to refund into the state treasury, the county depository, or municipal depository, as the case may be, such unexpended balance or balances as provided for in sections 31-17-57 and 31-17-59, it shall be the duty of the attorney general on behalf of the state, or the board of supervisors or municipal authorities on behalf of the county or municipality, as the case may be, to cause suit to be instituted for the recovery of such funds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4379; Laws, 1938, ch. 134.

§ 31-17-61.
State bonds; destruction of paid and cancelled bonds and coupons.

The State of Mississippi, acting by resolution of the State Bond Commission or any political subdivision thereof acting by resolution of its governing body, may authorize and direct the paying agent or agents for each issue of its bonds and coupons to destroy all bonds and coupons duly paid and cancelled, and may accept in lieu thereof their certificate containing a description of such bonds and coupons so destroyed as proof of such destruction. Such bonds and coupons duly paid and cancelled may be destroyed not earlier than one (1) year after the date upon which such bonds and coupons are surrendered for payment, and only after the resolution of the State Bond Commission or the political subdivision’s governing body authorizing the destruction thereof has been delivered to the paying agent or agents of the respective bond issues.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 376, § 3 (2nd ¶); Laws, 1985, ch. 429, eff from and after July 1, 1985.